Massachusetts, session 194th, H3864.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 100A of chapter 32 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
paragraph (j) the following paragraph:-
(k) This section shall apply to men and women who die on active duty whether combat
related or not.
of 1